Illinois, session 104th, SB3061.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 1A-8 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1A-8)  (from Ch. 46, par. 1A-8)7    Sec. 1A-8. The State Board of Elections shall exercise the 8following powers and perform the following duties in addition 9to any powers or duties otherwise provided for by law:10        (1) Assume all duties and responsibilities of the 11    State Electoral Board and the Secretary of State as 12    heretofore provided in this Code;13        (2) Disseminate information to and consult with 14    election authorities concerning the conduct of elections 15    and registration in accordance with the laws of this State 16    and the laws of the United States;17        (3) Furnish to each election authority prior to each 18    primary and general election and any other election it 19    deems necessary, a manual of uniform instructions 20    consistent with the provisions of this Code which shall be 21    used by election authorities in the preparation of the 22    official manual of instruction to be used by the judges of 23    election in any such election. In preparing such manual,   SB3061- 2 -LRB104 16949 SPS 30363 b1    the State Board shall consult with representatives of the 2    election authorities throughout the State. The State Board 3    may provide separate portions of the uniform instructions 4    applicable to different election jurisdictions which 5    administer elections under different options provided by 6    law. The State Board may by regulation require particular 7    portions of the uniform instructions to be included in any 8    official manual of instructions published by election 9    authorities. Any manual of instructions published by any 10    election authority shall be identical with the manual of 11    uniform instructions issued by the Board, but may be 12    adapted by the election authority to accommodate special 13    or unusual local election problems, provided that all 14    manuals published by election authorities must be 15    consistent with the provisions of this Code in all 16    respects and must receive the approval of the State Board 17    of Elections prior to publication; provided further that 18    if the State Board does not approve or disapprove of a 19    proposed manual within 60 days of its submission, the 20    manual shall be deemed approved;21        (4) Prescribe and require the use of such uniform 22    forms, notices, and other supplies not inconsistent with 23    the provisions of this Code as it shall deem advisable 24    which shall be used by election authorities in the conduct 25    of elections and registrations;26        (5) Prepare and certify the form of ballot for any   SB3061- 3 -LRB104 16949 SPS 30363 b1    proposed amendment to the Constitution of the State of 2    Illinois, or any referendum to be submitted to the 3    electors throughout the State or, when required to do so 4    by law, to the voters of any area or unit of local 5    government of the State;6        (6) Require such statistical reports regarding the 7    conduct of elections and registration from election 8    authorities as may be deemed necessary;9        (7) Review and inspect procedures and records relating 10    to conduct of elections and registration as may be deemed 11    necessary, and to report violations of election laws to 12    the appropriate State's Attorney or the Attorney General;13        (8) Recommend to the General Assembly legislation to 14    improve the administration of elections and registration;15        (9) Adopt, amend or rescind rules and regulations in 16    the performance of its duties provided that all such rules 17    and regulations must be consistent with the provisions of 18    this Article 1A or issued pursuant to authority otherwise 19    provided by law;20        (10) Determine the validity and sufficiency of 21    petitions filed under Article XIV, Section 3, of the 22    Constitution of the State of Illinois of 1970;23        (11) Maintain in its principal office a research 24    library that includes, but is not limited to, abstracts of 25    votes by precinct for general primary elections and 26    general elections, current precinct maps, and current   SB3061- 4 -LRB104 16949 SPS 30363 b1    precinct poll lists from all election jurisdictions within 2    the State. The research library shall be open to the 3    public during regular business hours. Such abstracts, 4    maps, and lists shall be preserved as permanent records 5    and shall be available for examination and copying at a 6    reasonable cost;7        (12) Supervise the administration of the registration 8    and election laws throughout the State;9        (13) Obtain from the Department of Central Management 10    Services, under Section 405-250 of the Department of 11    Central Management Services Law, such use of electronic 12    data processing equipment as may be required to perform 13    the duties of the State Board of Elections and to provide 14    election-related information to candidates, public and 15    party officials, interested civic organizations, and the 16    general public in a timely and efficient manner;17        (14) To take such action as may be necessary or 18    required to give effect to directions of the national 19    committee or State central committee of an established 20    political party under Sections 7-8, 7-11, and 7-14.1 or 21    such other provisions as may be applicable pertaining to 22    the selection of delegates and alternate delegates to an 23    established political party's national nominating 24    conventions or, notwithstanding any candidate 25    certification schedule contained within this Code, the 26    certification of the Presidential and Vice Presidential   SB3061- 5 -LRB104 16949 SPS 30363 b1    candidate selected by the established political party's 2    national nominating convention;3        (15) To post all early voting sites separated by 4    election authority and hours of operation on its website 5    at least 5 business days before the period for early 6    voting begins; 7        (16) To post on its website the statewide totals, and 8    totals separated by each election authority, for each of 9    the counts received pursuant to Section 1-9.2; and10        (17) To post on its website, in a downloadable format, 11    the information received from each election authority 12    under Section 1-17; .13        (18) To impose campaign disclosure penalties as set 14    forth in Article 9;15        (19) To hear and adjudicate alleged violations of the 16    registration requirements set forth in Section 9-35;17        (20) To revoke or suspend the raffle licenses of 18    political committees that violate Section 8.1 of the 19    Raffles and Poker Runs Act; and20        (21) To inform the Attorney General or the State's 21    Attorney of credible alleged criminal violations.22    The Board may by regulation delegate any of its duties or 23functions under this Article, except that final determinations 24and orders under this Article shall be issued only by the 25Board.26    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly   SB3061- 6 -LRB104 16949 SPS 30363 b1shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 2by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act, and 3filing such additional copies with the State Government Report 4Distribution Center for the General Assembly as is required 5under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State Library Act.6(Source: P.A. 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)